Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3095.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5719XL (2) 91 mb/jh S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 256.7, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 36. Submit to the general assembly and 3 governor, by October 1 of each year, a report identifying 4 each complaint or incident of antisemitism that occurred at 5 each community college, institution of higher education under 6 the control of the state board of regents, and public school 7 district from the prior academic year, and the findings and 8 outcomes of any investigations conducted, as reported by 9 each community college, institution of higher education, and 10 public school district. For the purposes of this subsection, 11 âantisemitismâ means the same as defined in section 216F.1. 12 Sec. 2. Section 260C.14, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 13 following new subsection: 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 27. Annually, by September 1, submit to the 15 state board of education a report identifying each complaint or 16 incident of antisemitism that occurred at the community college 17 from the prior academic year, and the findings and outcomes of 18 any investigations conducted. For purposes of this subsection, 19 âantisemitismâ means the same as defined in section 216F.1. 20 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 262.93A Annual report on antisemitism. 21 The state board of regents shall submit to the state board of 22 education, by September 1 of each year, a report identifying 23 each complaint or incident of antisemitism that occurred 24 at each of the institutions of higher education under the 25 control of the board from the prior academic year, and the 26 findings and outcomes of any investigations conducted. The 27 board shall conduct an annual review of the policies of the 28 regents institutions related to antisemitic actions and speech, 29 and provide the findings of such review in the report. For 30 purposes of this section, âantisemitismâ means the same as 31 defined in section 216F.1. 32 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 279.89 Annual report on antisemitism. 33 The board of directors of each public school district shall 34 report annually to the state board of education, by September 1 35 -1- LSB 5719XL (2) 91 mb/jh 1/ 2 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ of each year, a report identifying each complaint or incident 1 of antisemitism that occurred at the school district from 2 the prior academic year, and the findings and outcomes of 3 any investigations conducted. For purposes of this section, 4 âantisemitismâ means the same as defined in section 216F.1. 5